Texas statutes.
OCCUPATIONS CODE

TITLE 3. HEALTH PROFESSIONS

SUBTITLE K. PROFESSIONS RELATED TO USE OF CERTAIN MEDICAL EQUIPMENT

CHAPTER 602. MEDICAL PHYSICISTS

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 602.001. SHORT TITLE. This chapter may be cited as the Medical Physics Practice Act.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 602.002. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Advisory committee" means the Medical Physicist Licensure Advisory Committee.

(1-a) Repealed by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 , Sec. 2.197(6), eff. September 1, 2015.

(2) Repealed by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 , Sec. 2.197(6), eff. September 1, 2015.

(3) "Diagnostic radiological physics" means the branch of medical physics that deals with:

(A) the diagnostic application of:

(i) roentgen rays;

(ii) gamma rays from sealed sources;

(iii) ultrasonic radiation; or

(iv) radiofrequency radiation; and

(B) the use of equipment associated with the production and use of those types of radiation.

(4) "License" means a certificate issued by the medical board that authorizes the holder to engage in the practice of medical physics.

(5) "Licensed medical physicist" means a person who holds a license.

(5-a) "Medical board" means the Texas Medical Board.

(6) "Medical health physics" means the branch of medical physics that deals with the safe use of roentgen rays, gamma rays, electron or other charged particle beams, neutrons, radionuclides, and radiation from sealed radionuclide sources for both diagnostic and therapeutic purposes in humans and the use of equipment required to perform appropriate radiation tests and measurements.

(7) "Medical nuclear physics" means the branch of medical physics that deals with:

(A) the therapeutic and diagnostic application of radionuclides, except those used in sealed sources for therapeutic purposes; and

(B) the use of equipment associated with the production and use of radionuclides.

(8) "Medical physics" means the branch of physics that is associated with the practice of medicine, including the field of radiological physics.

(9) "Practice of medical radiological physics" means the use of principles and accepted protocols of physics to assure the correct quality, quantity, and placement of radiation during the performance of a radiological procedure prescribed by a practitioner that will protect the patient and others from harmful excessive radiation. The term includes:

(A) radiation beam calibration and characterization;

(B) quality assurance;

(C) instrument specification;

(D) acceptance testing;

(E) shielding design;

(F) protection analysis on radiation-emitting equipment and radiopharmaceuticals; and

(G) consultation with a physician to assure accurate radiation dosage to a specific patient.

(10) "Practitioner" means a person who:

(A) is licensed in this state as a doctor of:

(i) medicine;

(ii) osteopathy;

(iii) podiatry;

(iv) dentistry; or

(v) chiropractic; and

(B) prescribes radiologic procedures for other persons.

(11) "Radiation" means ionizing or nonionizing radiation above background levels used to perform a diagnostic or therapeutic medical or dental radiological procedure.

(12) "Radiological physics" means the branch of medical physics that includes:

(A) diagnostic radiological physics;

(B) medical health physics;

(C) medical nuclear physics; and

(D) therapeutic radiological physics.

(13) "Radiological procedure" means a test, measurement, calculation, or radiation exposure that:

(A) is used to diagnose or treat a disease or another human medical or dental condition; and

(B) includes the use of:

(i) diagnostic radiation;

(ii) nuclear magnetic resonance;

(iii) nuclear medicine procedures; or

(iv) therapeutic radiation.

(14) "Therapeutic radiological physics" means the branch of medical physics that deals with:

(A) the therapeutic application of:

(i) roentgen rays;

(ii) gamma rays;

(iii) electron and other charged particle beams;

(iv) neutrons; or

(v) radiation from a radionuclide source; and

(B) the use of equipment associated with the production and use of those types of radiation.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 5.150, eff. April 2, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 2.048, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 2.197(6), eff. September 1, 2015.

SUBCHAPTER B. MEDICAL PHYSICIST LICENSURE ADVISORY COMMITTEE

Sec. 602.051. ADVISORY COMMITTEE. (a) The advisory committee is an informal advisory committee to the medical board and is not subject to Chapter 2110, Government Code.

(b) The advisory committee has no independent rulemaking authority.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 2.050, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 602.052. APPOINTMENT OF ADVISORY COMMITTEE. (a) The advisory committee consists of seven members appointed by the president of the medical board as follows:

(1) four medical physicists licensed in this state who each have at least five years of experience as a medical physicist;

(2) two physicians licensed in this state who each have at least five years of clinical experience related to medical physics; and

(3) one member who represents the public.

(b) Repealed by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 , Sec. 2.197(7), eff. September 1, 2015.

(c) Repealed by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 , Sec. 2.197(7), eff. September 1, 2015.

(d) Appointments to the advisory committee shall be made without regard to the race, color, disability, creed, sex, religion, age, or national origin of the appointee.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 14.326(a), eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 2.051, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 2.052, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 2.197(7), eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 602.053. PUBLIC MEMBER ELIGIBILITY. (a) Repealed by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 , Sec. 2.197(8), eff. September 1, 2015.

(b) Repealed by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 , Sec. 2.197(8), eff. September 1, 2015.

(c) Repealed by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 , Sec. 2.197(8), eff. September 1, 2015.

(d) An advisory committee member representing the public must be a resident of this state for a period of not less than four years preceding appointment. A person may not be a member of the advisory committee representing the public if the person or the person's spouse:

(1) is registered, certified, or licensed by a regulatory agency in a health care profession;

(2) is employed by or participates in the management of a business entity or other organization regulated by or receiving money from the medical board;

(3) owns or controls, directly or indirectly, more than a 10 percent interest in a business entity or other organization regulated by or receiving money from the medical board; or

(4) uses or receives a substantial amount of tangible goods, services, or money from the medical board other than compensation or reimbursement authorized by law for medical board membership, attendance, or expenses.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 14.327(a), eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 2.053, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 2.054, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 2.197(8), eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 602.054. MEMBERSHIP RESTRICTIONS. (a) In this section, "Texas trade association" means a cooperative and voluntarily joined association of business or professional competitors in this state designed to assist its members and its industry or profession in dealing with mutual business or professional problems and in promoting their common interest.

(b) A person may not be a member of the advisory committee if:

(1) the person is an officer, employee, or paid consultant of a Texas trade association in the field of medicine; or

(2) the person's spouse is an officer, manager, or paid consultant of a Texas trade association in the field of medicine.

(c) A person may not serve as a member of the advisory committee if the person is required to register as a lobbyist under Chapter 305, Government Code, because of the person's activities for compensation on behalf of a profession related to the operation of the advisory committee or medical board.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 14.328(a), eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 2.055, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 602.055. TERMS; VACANCY. (a) Members of the advisory committee serve two-year terms. The terms of the members expire on February 1 of each odd-numbered year.

(b) A person is not eligible to serve more than two consecutive full terms.

(c) If a vacancy occurs during a member's term, the president of the medical board shall appoint a person to serve for the unexpired term.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 2.056, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 602.056. GROUNDS FOR REMOVAL.

(a) It is a ground for removal from the advisory committee that a member:

(1) does not have at the time of appointment the qualifications required by Section 602.052 for appointment to the advisory committee;

(2) does not maintain during service on the advisory committee the qualifications required by Section 602.052 for appointment to the advisory committee;

(3) is ineligible for membership under Section 602.053(d) or Section 602.054; or

(4) cannot, because of illness or disability, discharge the member's duties for a substantial part of the member's term.

(b) The validity of an action of the advisory committee is not affected by the fact that it is taken while a ground for removal of a member of the advisory committee exists.

(c) Repealed by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 , Sec. 2.197(9), eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 14.329(a), eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 5.151, eff. April 2, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 2.057, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 2.197(9), eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 602.057. COMPENSATION. A member of the advisory committee is entitled to a per diem in an amount set by the legislature for each day that the member engages in the business of the advisory committee.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 2.058, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 602.058. ADVISORY COMMITTEE OFFICERS; MEETINGS. (a) The president of the medical board shall biennially designate a member of the advisory committee as the presiding officer of the advisory committee to serve in that capacity at the will of the president. The advisory committee may elect from its members additional officers as necessary.

(b) The advisory committee shall meet as requested by the medical board. A meeting may be held by telephone conference call.

(c) Except as otherwise provided by this chapter, the advisory committee is subject to Chapters 551, 552, and 2001, Government Code.

(d) A majority of the advisory committee members constitutes a quorum for all purposes except when advisory committee members are participating in a proceeding of the medical board as described by Section 602.151(b).

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 14.330(a), eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 2.059, eff. September 1, 2015.

SUBCHAPTER D. MEDICAL BOARD POWERS AND DUTIES

Sec. 602.151. GENERAL POWERS AND DUTIES. (a) The medical board shall:

(1) adopt rules reasonably necessary to properly perform its duties under this chapter, including:

(A) procedural rules governing investigations, informal hearings, the issuance of cease and desist orders, and disciplinary sanctions; and

(B) rules governing character and conduct for applicants or license holders and fitness to practice medical physics in this state;

(2) establish qualifications for a medical physicist to practice in this state and the fitness of each applicant for a license or license renewal;

(3) establish minimum education and training requirements necessary for a license under this chapter;

(4) establish requirements for examinations for licensure;

(5) prescribe the application form for a license under this chapter;

(6) issue, deny, renew, revoke, cancel, restrict, suspend, or accept the surrender of a license;

(7) charge fees that are reasonable and necessary to cover the costs of administering this chapter;

(8) conduct informal hearings concerning violations of this chapter or rules adopted under this chapter;

(9) issue disciplinary sanctions, including agreed orders and non-disciplinary remedial plans; and

(10) establish procedures for making a confidential referral to the Texas Physician Health Program established under Chapter 167, and for requiring participation in the program as a prerequisite for issuing or maintaining a license under this chapter.

(b) The medical board may include any member of the advisory committee in a proceeding of the medical board related to a power or duty described by Subsection (a) if the medical board considers the expertise of the advisory committee member to be beneficial in the proceeding.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 5.155, eff. April 2, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 2.061, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 602.152. CONSUMER INTEREST INFORMATION; COMPLAINTS. (a) The medical board shall prepare information of consumer interest describing the regulatory functions of the medical board and the procedures by which complaints are filed with and resolved by the medical board.

(b) The medical board shall maintain a file on each written complaint filed with the medical board. The file must include:

(1) the name of the person who filed the complaint;

(2) the date the complaint is received by the medical board;

(3) the subject matter of the complaint;

(4) the name of each person contacted in relation to the complaint;

(5) a summary of the results of the review or investigation of the complaint; and

(6) an explanation of the reason the file was closed, if the medical board closed the file without taking action other than to investigate the complaint.

(c) The medical board shall provide to the person filing the complaint and to each person who is a subject of the complaint a copy of the medical board's policies and procedures relating to complaint investigation and resolution.

(d) The medical board, at least quarterly until final disposition of the complaint, shall notify the person filing the complaint and each person who is a subject of the complaint of the status of the complaint unless the notice would jeopardize an undercover investigation.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 14.332(a), eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 2.062, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 602.1521. PUBLIC PARTICIPATION. The medical board shall develop and implement policies that provide the public with a reasonable opportunity to appear before the medical board and to speak on any issue relating to medical physicists.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 14.330(b), eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 2.063, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 602.1525. SUBPOENAS; CONFIDENTIALITY OF INFORMATION. (a) The executive director of the medical board, the director's designee, or the secretary-treasurer of the medical board may issue a subpoena or subpoena duces tecum:

(1) to conduct an investigation or a contested case proceeding related to:

(A) alleged misconduct by a medical physicist;

(B) an alleged violation of this chapter or another law related to the practice of medical physics; or

(C) the provision of health care under this chapter; or

(2) for purposes of determining whether to issue, suspend, restrict, or revoke a license under this chapter.

(a-1) Failure to timely comply with a subpoena issued under this section is a ground for:

(1) disciplinary action by the medical board or another licensing or regulatory agency with jurisdiction over the person subject to the subpoena; and

(2) denial of a license application.

(b) Repealed by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 , Sec. 2.197(12), eff. September 1, 2015.

(c) Repealed by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 , Sec. 2.197(12), eff. September 1, 2015.

(d) Repealed by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 , Sec. 2.197(12), eff. September 1, 2015.

(e) Repealed by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 , Sec. 2.197(12), eff. September 1, 2015.

(f) Repealed by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 , Sec. 2.197(12), eff. September 1, 2015.

(g) Repealed by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 , Sec. 2.197(12), eff. September 1, 2015.

(h) All information and materials subpoenaed or compiled by the medical board in connection with a complaint and investigation are confidential and not subject to disclosure under Chapter 552, Government Code, and not subject to disclosure, discovery, subpoena, or other means of legal compulsion for their release to anyone other than the medical board or its agents or employees who are involved in discipline of the holder of a license, except that this information may be disclosed to:

(1) persons involved with the medical board in a disciplinary action against the holder of a license;

(2) professional medical physics licensing or disciplinary boards in other jurisdictions;

(3) peer assistance programs approved by the medical board under Chapter 467, Health and Safety Code;

(4) law enforcement agencies; and

(5) persons engaged in bona fide research, if all individual-identifying information has been deleted.

(i) The filing of formal charges by the medical board against a holder of a license, the nature of those charges, disciplinary proceedings of the medical board, and final disciplinary actions, including warnings and reprimands, by the medical board are not confidential and are subject to disclosure in accordance with Chapter 552, Government Code.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 14.332(b), eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 5.156, eff. April 2, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 2.064, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 2.065, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 2.197(12), eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 602.153. CONTINUING EDUCATION. The medical board shall recognize, prepare, or administer continuing education programs for persons licensed under this chapter. A license holder must participate in the programs to the extent required by the medical board to keep the person's license.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 14.331(b), eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 2.066, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 602.154. RULES RELATING TO ADVERTISING OR COMPETITIVE BIDDING. (a) The medical board may not adopt rules restricting advertising or competitive bidding by a license holder except to prohibit false, misleading, or deceptive practices.

(b) In its rules to prohibit false, misleading, or deceptive practices, the medical board may not include a rule that:

(1) restricts the use of any medium for advertising;

(2) restricts the use of a license holder's personal appearance or voice in an advertisement;

(3) relates to the size or duration of an advertisement by the license holder; or

(4) restricts the license holder's advertisement under a trade name.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 14.332(c), eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 2.067, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 602.156. RULES ON CONSEQUENCES OF CRIMINAL CONVICTION. The medical board shall adopt rules and guidelines as necessary to comply with Chapter 53, except to the extent the requirements of this chapter are stricter than the requirements of Chapter 53.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 2.068, eff. September 1, 2015.

SUBCHAPTER E. LICENSE REQUIREMENTS

Sec. 602.201. LICENSE REQUIRED; SPECIALTY LICENSE. (a) A person may not practice medical physics without a license.

(b) A medical physicist may not practice the following specialties unless the person holds a license for that specialty:

(1) diagnostic radiological physics;

(2) medical health physics;

(3) medical nuclear physics; or

(4) therapeutic radiological physics.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 602.202. EXEMPTIONS FROM LICENSE REQUIREMENT. This chapter does not apply to:

(1) a practitioner engaged in the performance of radiological procedures;

(2) a person certified as a medical radiological technologist practicing under Chapter 601;

(3) a person who performs radiological procedures under a practitioner's instruction or supervision;

(4) a person performing beam calibration and characterization, quality assurance, instrument specification, acceptance testing, shielding design, or protection analysis on radiation-emitting equipment or radiopharmaceuticals for procedures not involved with the diagnosis or treatment of a disease or another human medical or dental condition; or

(5) a person who is:

(A) employed by a state or federal regulatory agency; and

(B) performing duties in the scope of the person's employment.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 602.203. LICENSE APPLICATION. (a) A person may apply for a license by filing an application with the medical board.

(b) An application must be on a form prescribed by the medical board and must include:

(1) evidence of relevant work experience, including a description of the duties performed;

(2) an official transcript from the college or university granting the applicant's degree;

(3) a statement of the medical physics specialty for which the application is submitted;

(4) three professional references; and

(5) any additional information required by medical board rule.

(c) The applicant must submit with the application the fee prescribed by the medical board.

(d) The medical board may require an applicant to appear before the medical board to present additional information in support of the application.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 2.069, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 602.205. TEMPORARY LICENSE. The medical board may issue a temporary license to an applicant who has satisfied the educational requirements for a license but who has not yet completed the experience and examination requirements of Section 602.207. A temporary license is valid for one year from the date of issuance.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 5.158, eff. April 2, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 2.070, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 602.206. EXAMINATION. (a) The medical board shall administer a written examination for a license to qualified applicants at least two times each year.

(b) Each applicant shall take the examination for the medical physics specialty requested by the applicant in the license application.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 2.071, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 602.207. ELIGIBILITY FOR EXAMINATION. (a) To be eligible to take an examination for a license, an applicant must:

(1) have a master's or doctoral degree from an accredited college or university that signifies the completion of courses approved by the medical board in physics, medical physics, biophysics, radiological physics, medical health physics, or equivalent courses;

(2) have demonstrated, to the medical board's satisfaction, completion of at least two years of full-time work experience in the five years preceding the date of application in the medical physics specialty for which application is made; and

(3) submit a completed application as required by Section 602.203.

(b) Work experience in more than one specialty must include six additional months for each additional specialty.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 2.072, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 602.208. EXAMINATION RESULTS; REEXAMINATION. (a) The medical board shall notify each examinee of the results of the examination not later than the 30th day after the date the examination is administered. If an examination is graded or reviewed by a national or state testing service, the medical board shall notify each examinee of the results of the examination not later than the 14th day after the date the medical board receives the results from the testing service.

(b) If the medical board learns that the notice of the examination results will be delayed for more than 90 days after the examination date, the medical board shall notify each examinee of the reason for the delay not later than the 90th day.

(c) If requested by a person who fails the examination, the medical board shall provide to the person an analysis of the person's performance on the examination.

(d) The medical board by rule shall establish procedures and requirements for reexamination of an applicant who fails the examination.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 2.073, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 602.2081. CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORD INFORMATION REQUIREMENT FOR LICENSE. (a) The medical board shall require that an applicant for a license submit a complete and legible set of fingerprints, on a form prescribed by the medical board, to the medical board or to the Department of Public Safety for the purpose of obtaining criminal history record information from the Department of Public Safety and the Federal Bureau of Investigation.

(b) The medical board may not issue a license to a person who does not comply with the requirement of Subsection (a).

(c) The medical board shall conduct a criminal history check of each applicant for a license using information:

(1) provided by the individual under this section; and

(2) made available to the medical board by the Department of Public Safety, the Federal Bureau of Investigation, and any other criminal justice agency under Chapter 411, Government Code.

(d) The medical board may:

(1) enter into an agreement with the Department of Public Safety to administer a criminal history check required under this section; and

(2) authorize the Department of Public Safety to collect from each applicant the costs incurred by the Department of Public Safety in conducting the criminal history check.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 2.074, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 602.209. LICENSE ISSUANCE. (a) The medical board may issue a license to an eligible applicant who:

(1) passes the examination under Section 602.206; and

(2) meets all other license requirements.

(b) Not later than the 30th day after the date the medical board makes a decision on an application submitted under Section 602.203, the medical board shall notify the applicant of the decision.

(c) If the medical board approves the application, the medical board shall issue a license to the applicant. If the medical board denies the application, the medical board shall include in the notice of decision a description of the areas of deficiency.

(d) Each license issued under this chapter must be uniform, except that each license must indicate:

(1) the license holder's name;

(2) the serial number assigned to the license holder; and

(3) the medical physics specialty the license holder may practice.

(e) A license certificate is the medical board's property and must be surrendered on demand.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 2.075, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 602.210. LICENSE TERM AND RENEWAL. (a) A license is valid for two years from the date of issuance and may be renewed.

(b) The medical board by rule may adopt a system under which licenses expire on various dates during the year.

(c) A person may renew an unexpired license by paying the required renewal fee to the medical board before the expiration date of the license.

(d) If a person's license has been expired for 90 days or less, the person may renew the license by paying to the medical board the required renewal fee and a penalty fee in an amount equal to one-half of the amount of the renewal fee.

(e) If a person's license has been expired for longer than 90 days but less than one year, the person may renew the license by paying to the medical board the renewal fee that was due at expiration and a penalty fee in an amount equal to the amount of the renewal fee.

(f) If a person's license has been expired for one year or longer, the person may not renew the license. To obtain a new license, a person must comply with the requirements and procedures for obtaining an original license, including the examination requirement.

(g) Not later than the 30th day before the date a person's license expires, the medical board shall send written notice of the impending license expiration to the person at the license holder's last known address according to the records of the medical board.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 5.159, eff. April 2, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 2.076, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 602.2101. CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORD INFORMATION REQUIREMENT FOR RENEWAL. (a) An applicant renewing a license shall submit a complete and legible set of fingerprints for purposes of performing a criminal history check of the applicant as provided by Section 602.2081.

(b) The medical board may not renew the license of a person who does not comply with the requirement of Subsection (a).

(c) A license holder is not required to submit fingerprints under this section for the renewal of the license if the license holder has previously submitted fingerprints under:

(1) Section 602.2081 for the initial issuance of the license; or

(2) this section as part of a prior renewal of the license.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 2.077, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 602.211. LICENSE BY ENDORSEMENT OR RECIPROCITY. (a) On receipt of an application and fee under Section 602.203, the medical board may waive any prerequisite for obtaining a license to a person who holds a license to practice medical or radiological physics in another state, territory, or jurisdiction acceptable to the medical board that has requirements for the licensing of medical or radiological physicists that are substantially the same as the requirements of this chapter.

(b) The medical board may waive any prerequisite for obtaining a license to practice medical physics in this state for an applicant who holds a license issued by another jurisdiction with which this state has a reciprocity agreement. The medical board may make an agreement, subject to the approval of the governor, with another state to allow for licensing by reciprocity.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 14.334(a), eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 2.078, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 602.212. LICENSE HOLDER DUTIES. A license holder shall:

(1) publicly display the license holder's license in an appropriate manner; and

(2) report immediately to the medical board any change in the license holder's address.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 2.079, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 602.213. PROVISIONAL LICENSE. (a) The medical board may issue a provisional license to an applicant currently licensed or certified in another jurisdiction who seeks a license in this state and who:

(1) has been licensed or certified in good standing as a practitioner of medical or radiologic physics for at least two years in another jurisdiction, including a foreign country, that has licensing or certification requirements substantially equivalent to the requirements of this chapter;

(2) has passed a national or other examination recognized by the medical board relating to the practice of medical or radiologic physics; and

(3) is sponsored by a person licensed by the medical board under this chapter with whom the provisional license holder will practice during the time the person holds a provisional license.

(b) The medical board may waive the requirement of Subsection (a)(3) for an applicant if the medical board determines that compliance with that subsection would be a hardship to the applicant.

(c) A provisional license is valid until the date the medical board approves or denies the provisional license holder's application for a license. The medical board shall issue a license under this chapter to the provisional license holder if:

(1) the provisional license holder is eligible to be certified under Section 602.211; or

(2) the provisional license holder passes the part of the examination under Section 602.206 that relates to the applicant's knowledge and understanding of the laws and rules relating to the practice of medical physics in this state and:

(A) the medical board verifies that the provisional license holder meets the academic and experience requirements for a license under this chapter; and

(B) the provisional license holder satisfies any other licensing requirements under this chapter.

(d) The medical board must approve or deny a provisional license holder's application for a license not later than the 180th day after the date the provisional license is issued. The medical board may extend the 180-day period if the results of an examination have not been received by the medical board before the end of that period.

(e) The medical board may establish a fee for provisional licenses.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 14.335(a), eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 5.160, eff. April 2, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 2.080, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 602.214. REFUSAL FOR VIOLATION OF BOARD ORDER. The medical board may refuse to renew a license issued under this chapter if the license holder is in violation of a medical board order.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 567 (S.B. 674), Sec. 13, eff. September 1, 2017.

SUBCHAPTER F. LICENSE DENIAL AND DISCIPLINARY ACTION

Sec. 602.251. GROUNDS FOR LICENSE DENIAL OR DISCIPLINARY ACTION. The medical board may refuse to issue or renew a license, suspend, restrict, or revoke a license, or reprimand a license holder for:

(1) obtaining or renewing a license by means of fraud, misrepresentation, or concealment of a material fact;

(2) having previously applied for or held a license issued by the licensing authority of another state, territory, or jurisdiction that was denied, suspended, or revoked by that licensing authority;

(3) engaging in unprofessional conduct that endangered or is likely to endanger the health, safety, or welfare of the public as defined by medical board rule;

(4) violating this chapter, a lawful order or rule of the medical board, or the medical board's code of ethics; or

(5) being convicted of:

(A) a felony; or

(B) a misdemeanor involving moral turpitude or that directly relates to the person's duties as a licensed medical physicist.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 14.336(a), eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 2.081, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 602.252. ADMINISTRATIVE PROCEDURE FOR CONTESTED CASE HEARING. Chapter 2001, Government Code, and medical board rules for a contested case hearing apply to a proceeding by the medical board under this chapter in which a formal complaint has been filed.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 2.082, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 602.2521. INFORMAL PROCEDURES. (a) The medical board by rule shall adopt procedures governing:

(1) informal disposition of a contested case under Section 2001.056, Government Code; and

(2) informal proceedings held in compliance with Section 2001.054, Government Code.

(b) Rules adopted under Subsection (a) must:

(1) provide the complainant, if applicable and permitted by law, an opportunity to be heard;

(2) provide the license holder an opportunity to be heard; and

(3) require the medical board's legal counsel or a representative of the attorney general to be present to advise the medical board or the medical board's employees.

(c) Chapters 551 and 552, Government Code, do not apply to an investigation file and investigative information in the possession of or used by the medical board in an informal proceeding under this section.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 2.083, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 602.253. PROBATION. The medical board may place on probation a person whose license is suspended. If a license suspension is probated, the medical board may require the person to:

(1) report regularly to the medical board on matters that are the basis of the probation;

(2) limit practice to the areas prescribed by the medical board; or

(3) continue or review professional education until the person attains a degree of skill satisfactory to the medical board in those areas that are the basis of the probation.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 14.336(b), eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 2.084, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 602.254. EMERGENCY SUSPENSION. (a) The medical board or a three-member panel of medical board members designated by the president of the medical board shall temporarily suspend the license of a license holder if the medical board or panel determines from the evidence or information presented to it that continued practice by the license holder would constitute a continuing and imminent threat to the public welfare.

(b) A license may be suspended under this section without notice or hearing on the complaint if:

(1) action is taken to initiate proceedings for a hearing before the State Office of Administrative Hearings simultaneously with the temporary suspension; and

(2) a hearing is held as soon as practicable under this chapter and Chapter 2001, Government Code.

(c) The State Office of Administrative Hearings shall hold a preliminary hearing not later than the 14th day after the date of the temporary suspension to determine if there is probable cause to believe that a continuing and imminent threat to the public welfare still exists. A final hearing on the matter shall be held not later than the 61st day after the date of the temporary suspension.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 326, Sec. 14, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 2.085, eff. September 1, 2015.

SUBCHAPTER G. ENFORCEMENT

Sec. 602.301. INJUNCTION. The medical board shall prosecute or file suit to enjoin a violation of this chapter or a rule adopted under this chapter.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 2.086, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 602.3015. CIVIL PENALTY. (a) A person who violates this chapter or a rule adopted or order issued under this chapter is liable for a civil penalty not to exceed $5,000 a day.

(b) At the request of the medical board, the attorney general shall bring an action to recover a civil penalty authorized under this section.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 326, Sec. 15, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 2.087, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 602.302. OFFENSE. (a) A person commits an offense if the person:

(1) practices medical physics without holding a license under this chapter;

(2) practices a specialty of medical physics without holding a license for the specialty;

(3) practices medical physics in violation of this chapter; or

(4) uses in any manner letters, terminology, symbols, or signs to indicate or imply that the person is qualified or licensed to practice medical physics in a manner for which the person is not licensed under this chapter.

(b) An offense under this section is a Class A misdemeanor.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 326, Sec. 16, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

SUBCHAPTER H. ADMINISTRATIVE PENALTY

Sec. 602.351. IMPOSITION OF ADMINISTRATIVE PENALTY. (a) The medical board may impose an administrative penalty on a person licensed under this chapter who violates this chapter or a rule adopted or order issued under this chapter. A penalty collected under this subchapter shall be deposited in the state treasury in the general revenue fund.

(b) A proceeding to impose the penalty is considered to be a contested case under Chapter 2001, Government Code.

(c) The amount of the penalty may not exceed $500 for each violation, and each day a violation continues or occurs is a separate violation for purposes of imposing a penalty. The total amount of the penalty assessed for a violation continuing or occurring on separate days under this subsection may not exceed $2,500.

(d) The amount shall be based on:

(1) the seriousness of the violation, including the nature, circumstances, extent, and gravity of the violation;

(2) the threat to health or safety caused by the violation;

(3) the history of previous violations;

(4) the amount necessary to deter a future violation;

(5) whether the violator demonstrated good faith, including, when applicable, whether the violator made good faith efforts to correct the violation; and

(6) any other matter that justice may require.

(e) If the medical board determines that a violation occurred, the medical board shall give written notice by certified mail to the person.

(f) The notice under Subsection (e) must:

(1) include a brief summary of the alleged violation;

(2) state the amount of the recommended penalty; and

(3) inform the person of the person's right to a hearing on the occurrence of the violation, the amount of the penalty, or both.

(g) Within 20 days after the date the person receives the notice under Subsection (e), the person in writing may:

(1) accept the determination and recommended penalty; or

(2) make a request for a hearing on the occurrence of the violation, the amount of the penalty, or both.

(h) If the person accepts the determination and recommended penalty or if the person fails to respond to the notice, the medical board by order shall approve the determination and impose the recommended penalty.

(i) If the person requests a hearing, the medical board shall refer the matter to the State Office of Administrative Hearings, which shall promptly set a hearing date and give written notice of the time and place of the hearing to the person. An administrative law judge of the State Office of Administrative Hearings shall conduct the hearing.

(j) The administrative law judge shall make findings of fact and conclusions of law and promptly issue to the medical board a proposal for a decision about the occurrence of the violation and the amount of a proposed penalty.

(k) Based on the findings of fact, conclusions of law, and proposal for a decision, the medical board by order may determine that:

(1) a violation occurred and impose a penalty; or

(2) a violation did not occur.

(l) The notice of the medical board's order under Subsection (k) that is sent to the person in accordance with Chapter 2001, Government Code, must include a statement of the right of the person to judicial review of the order.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 14.337(a), eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 2.088, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 602.352. PAYMENT AND COLLECTION OF ADMINISTRATIVE PENALTY; JUDICIAL REVIEW. (a) Within 30 days after the date an order of the medical board under Section 602.351(k) that imposes an administrative penalty becomes final, the person shall:

(1) pay the penalty; or

(2) file a petition for judicial review of the medical board's order contesting the occurrence of the violation, the amount of the penalty, or both.

(b) Within the 30-day period prescribed by Subsection (a), a person who files a petition for judicial review may:

(1) stay enforcement of the penalty by:

(A) paying the penalty to the court for placement in an escrow account; or

(B) giving the court a supersedeas bond approved by the court that is:

(i) for the amount of the penalty; and

(ii) effective until all judicial review of the medical board's order is final; or

(2) request the court to stay enforcement of the penalty by:

(A) filing with the court a sworn affidavit of the person stating that the person is financially unable to pay the penalty and is financially unable to give the supersedeas bond; and

(B) sending a copy of the affidavit to the medical board by certified mail.

(c) If the medical board receives a copy of an affidavit under Subsection (b)(2), the medical board may file with the court, within five days after the date the copy is received, a contest to the affidavit. The court shall hold a hearing on the facts alleged in the affidavit as soon as practicable and shall stay the enforcement of the penalty on finding that the alleged facts are true. The person who files an affidavit has the burden of proving that the person is financially unable to pay the penalty or to give a supersedeas bond.

(d) If the person does not pay the penalty and the enforcement of the penalty is not stayed, the penalty may be collected. The attorney general may sue to collect the penalty.

(e) If the court sustains the determination that a violation occurred, the court may uphold or reduce the amount of the penalty and order the person to pay the full or reduced amount of the penalty.

(f) If the court does not sustain the determination that a violation occurred, the court shall order that a penalty is not owed.

(g) If the person paid the penalty and if the amount of the penalty is reduced or the penalty is not upheld by the court, the court shall order, when the court's judgment becomes final, that the appropriate amount plus accrued interest be remitted to the person within 30 days after the date that the judgment of the court becomes final. The interest accrues at the rate charged on loans to depository institutions by the New York Federal Reserve Bank. The interest shall be paid for the period beginning on the date the penalty is paid and ending on the date the penalty is remitted.

(h) If the person gave a supersedeas bond and the penalty is not upheld by the court, the court shall order, when the court's judgment becomes final, the release of the bond. If the person gave a supersedeas bond and the amount of the penalty is reduced, the court shall order the release of the bond after the person pays the reduced amount.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 14.337(a), eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 838 (S.B. 202), Sec. 2.089, eff. September 1, 2015.